Connecticut, session 2026, HB05538.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioners of Economic and
2 Community Development and Revenue Services shall study the finance
3 policies of this state and surrounding states to identify programmatic
4 and legislative changes that may be made to develop the economic
5 competitiveness of the state. The commissioners may consult with any
6 individuals, businesses and state agencies the commissioners deem
7 necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of the study. Not
8 later than January 1, 2027, the commissioners shall submit a report, in
9 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
10 on the commissioners' findings and recommendations to the joint
11 standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
12 matters relating to commerce and finance, revenue and bonding.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
HB5538 / File No. 670 1

HB5538 File No. 670
Section 1 from passage New section
FIN Joint Favorable
HB5538 / File No. 670 2

HB5538 File No. 670
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact by requiring the Departments of
Economic and Community Development (DECD) and Revenue Services
(DRS) to study the finance policies of this state and surrounding states
to identify programmatic and legislative changes that may be made to
develop the economic competitiveness of the state. It is anticipated that
DECD and DRS can produce the study within existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5538 / File No. 670 3

HB5538 File No. 670
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5538
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF STATE FINANCE POLICIES.